Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2419
Permits; approval; conditions; restrictions.

(1) No new animal feeding operation shall be issued a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit or a construction and operating permit in any part of a watershed that feeds directly or indirectly into a cold water class A stream, delineated pursuant to section 54-2421.

(2) An existing animal feeding operation may not expand if its livestock waste control facility is located within one mile of a designated cold water class A stream segment delineated pursuant to section 54-2421 and the same cold water class A stream watershed as the animal feeding operation, except that an existing animal feeding operation used for research sponsored by the University of Nebraska at a facility owned by the University of Nebraska may expand if the department determines based on scientific information provided in the application or other available scientific information that the proposed expansion does not pose a potential threat to the stream.

(3) Existing animal feeding operations may receive a new or modified National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, a new or modified construction and operating permit, a modified operating permit, or a modified construction approval if:

(a) The existing animal feeding operation does not currently have a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit or a construction and operating permit and upon inspection by the department a determination is made that one is necessary;

(b) The existing animal feeding operation modifies its operation but does not expand its approved livestock waste control facility;

(c) The existing animal feeding operation's livestock waste control facility is located more than two miles from a designated cold water class A stream segment delineated pursuant to section 54-2421 and in the same cold water class A stream watershed as the animal feeding operation; or

(d) The existing animal feeding operation or livestock waste control facility is located less than two miles but more than one mile from a cold water class A stream delineated pursuant to section 54-2421, and the department determines based on scientific information provided in the application or other available scientific information that the proposed expansion does not pose a potential threat to the stream.

(4) The department may deny or restrict an application for a transfer or major modification of an existing National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit or a construction and operating permit based upon the potential degradation of a cold water class A stream.

Laws 1998, LB 1209, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 822, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 870, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 54-2404;

Laws 2004, LB 916, § 8;

Laws 2006, LB 975, § 4.